test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: daagmensming
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: daagmenyman
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: daagmenyming
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: daagmenymag
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: daagmensman
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: daagmensming
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: daagmensmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmenyshinaa
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmensshinaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmenyshinaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmenyshiwaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmensshinaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmensshiwaa
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: daagmenyshini
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: daagmensshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: ndaagmenyshiba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenyshidig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: ndaagmensshiba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensshidig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gdaagmenyshiba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenyshidig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gdaagmensshiba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensshidig
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: daagmenyshiba
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmenyshidig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: daagmensshiba
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+4: ndaagmenyshan
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: ndaagmenyshing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: ndaagmenyshag
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+4: ndaagmensshan
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: ndaagmensshing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: ndaagmensshag
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+4: gdaagmenyshan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gdaagmenyshing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gdaagmenyshag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gdaagmensshan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gdaagmensshing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gdaagmensshag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+4: daagmenyshan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: daagmenyshing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+4: daagmensshan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: daagmensshing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+4: daagmenyshan
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: daagmenyshing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: daagmenyshag
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+4: daagmensshan
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: daagmensshing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: daagmensshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmenynaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenynaandig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmensnaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenynaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenynaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenywaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenywaadig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensnaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenswaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenswaadig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: daagmenyniwba
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: daagmensniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: ndaagmenynaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmenynaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmenynaanig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: ndaagmensnaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmensnaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmensnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gdaagmenynaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenynaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenynaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gdaagmenywaan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenywaang
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenywaag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gdaagmensnaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensnaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gdaagmenswaan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenswaang
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenswaag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: daagmenywaan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: daagmenywaang
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4+4: daagmenyniwan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: daagmenyniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: daagmenswaan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: daagmenswaang
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4+4: daagmensniwan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: daagmensniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+4: ndaagmenybaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenybaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenybaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+4: ndaagmensbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+4: gdaagmenybaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenybaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenybaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gdaagmensbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensbaniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+4: daagmenybaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: daagmenybaniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+4: daagmensbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: daagmensbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+4: daagmenybaniin
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: daagmenybaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: daagmenybaniig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+4: daagmensbaniin
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: daagmensbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: daagmensbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmimshinaa
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmimshinaa
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmimshiwaa
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: daagmimshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndaagmimshiba
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmimshidig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdaagmimshiba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimshidig
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: daagmimshiba
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmimshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndaagmimshan
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndaagmimshing
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndaagmimshag
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdaagmimshan
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdaagmimshing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdaagmimshag
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmimshan
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmimshing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmimshan
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmimshing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: daagmimshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmimnaanba
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmimnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmimnaanba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmimwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: daagmimniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndaagmimnaanin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmimnaaning
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmimnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdaagmimnaanin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmimnaaning
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmimnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdaagmimwaan
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmimwaang
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmimwaag
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: daagmimwaan
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: daagmimwaang
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: daagmimniwan
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: daagmimniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndaagmimbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndaagmimbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndaagmimbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdaagmimbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimbaniig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmimbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmimbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmimbaniin
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmimbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: daagmimbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmishnaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmishnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmishnaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmishnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmishwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmishwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmishnaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmishnaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmishnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmishnaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmishnaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmishnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmishwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmishwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmishwaag
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmishwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmishwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4+4: daagmishniwan
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmishbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmishbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmishbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmishbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmishbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmishbaniig
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+4: daagmishbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmishbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+4: daagmishbaniin
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmishbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagminaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagminaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagminaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagminaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagminaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagminaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmiwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+3+4+Prt+4: daagminwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagminwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: aagmenyshibniin
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: aagmenyshibniing
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: aagmenyshibniig
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: aagmensshibniin
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: aagmensshibniing
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: aagmensshibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmenymishnaa
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmensmishnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmenymishnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmenymishwaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmensmishnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmensmishwaa
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: daagmenymishni
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: daagmensmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndaagmenymishba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenymishdig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndaagmensmishba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensmishdig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdaagmenymishba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenymishdig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdaagmensmishba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensmishdig
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: daagmenymishba
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmenymishdig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: daagmensmishba
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmensmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndaagmenymishan
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndaagmenymishing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndaagmenymishag
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndaagmensmishan
